Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 50 Compensation and Qualifications of Judges — Jurisdiction
16-15-5006. Financial responsibility of counties — Litigation tax for counties.

Each county shall be responsible for paying the base salary, any supplements and any annual adjustments for all of the general sessions judges in the county. Counties are authorized to impose a local litigation tax on each civil case filed in general sessions court, or in a court where the general sessions judge serves as judge, except juvenile court, and are authorized to impose a local litigation tax on each criminal conviction in general sessions court. In order for the tax to be effective, it must be approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body of any county wishing to impose it. Its approval by the county legislative body must be proclaimed by the presiding officer of the body and certified by the presiding officer to the secretary of state. The litigation tax authorized by this section may be effective on or after July 1, 1990, and may be in any amount up to six dollars ($6.00) per case. Proceeds of the litigation tax shall be paid to the county general fund. It is the intent of the general assembly that the proceeds of this local tax aid in defraying the cost to counties of paying the general sessions court judges. If, during any fiscal year, the amount of revenue generated by the local tax enacted pursuant to this section does not sufficiently fund the increase in the general sessions judge's compensation mandated by this part or the salary supplement as provided for under § 16-15-205(d)(2) [repealed], the local litigation tax may be raised to an amount more than six dollars ($6.00) necessary to fund the increase mandated by this part or the salary supplement as provided for under § 16-15-205(d)(2) [repealed]; provided, that any increase to fund the supplement shall be adjusted annually.

Any increase in expenditures by a county resulting from the increase provided by this part shall be appropriated from funds that the county receives from the state government that are not earmarked by statute for a particular purpose.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 7; 1990, ch. 637, § 5; 1997, ch. 556, § 1; 2004, ch. 684, § 1; 2015, ch. 223, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted the following language from the second sentence in (a) following “Counties,”: “, except those having a population in excess of five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census and any subsequent federal census and a metropolitan form of government,” which formerly qualified which counties were authorized to impose a litigation tax.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 223, § 1. April 20, 2015.

Cross-References. Local litigation taxes, title 67, ch. 4, part 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed amendment to litigation tax, OAG 96-099 (7/31/96).

16-15-5007. Administrative director of Tennessee general sessions judge's conference — Litigation tax for state.

The administrative director of the courts shall also serve as the administrative director of the Tennessee general sessions judges’ conference. The administrative director of the courts may serve the conference with existing staff or may, with a portion of the proceeds of the litigation tax earmarked to the administrative director's office, employ such additional staff as may be necessary to adequately serve the general sessions judges.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 6; 1990, ch. 637, § 6; 1993, ch. 66, § 25; 1993, ch. 241, § 24; 2005, ch. 429, § 19.

Cross-References. Applicability to certain counties, § 16-15-5011.

16-15-5008. Additional litigation tax for state.

Effective July 1, 1988, there is imposed a litigation tax, in addition to the tax imposed by § 16-15-5007 of two dollars ($2.00) on each civil case filed in general sessions court or in a court where the general sessions judge serves as judge, and of two dollars ($2.00) on each criminal conviction in general sessions court. The litigation tax imposed by this section shall not apply to cases in juvenile court.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 6; 1990, ch. 637, § 7.

Cross-References. Applicability to certain counties, § 16-15-5011.

16-15-5009. Jurisdiction added by private act.

If added jurisdiction to hear probate, domestic relations or workers' compensation cases is given to a general sessions court by private act, cases shall be filed in either the circuit court clerk's or clerk and master's office unless otherwise provided by private act. The general sessions court that has been given the added jurisdiction to hear such cases shall be assigned cases for hearing by agreement of the general sessions court judges and the circuit court judges and the chancellors.

If added jurisdiction in juvenile cases is given to a general sessions court by private act, cases shall be filed in the clerk's office where the cases are presently filed unless otherwise provided by private act.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 11.

16-15-5010. Index and table of jurisdiction.

The Tennessee code commission shall publish in this code an index of acts pertaining to the jurisdiction of courts of general sessions by county and compile a tabulation of such jurisdiction by court.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the index of acts, referred to in this section, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-15-5011. Applicability to certain counties.

Only §§ 16-15-5007 and 16-15-5008 apply to any county having a population in excess of four hundred fifty thousand (450,000) and any county having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1988, ch. 698, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-15-5012. Promulgation of uniform general sessions court warrant.

The administrative office of the courts (AOC), in consultation with the general sessions judges’ conference, court clerks' association, the sheriffs' association and the association of chiefs of police, shall design and promulgate a uniform general sessions court warrant. The purpose of the warrant is to make uniform the information contained on the warrant so that the AOC can compile accurate data on cases in general sessions courts across the state and to make the transfer of the warrant or information contained on the warrant to the AOC as quick and efficient as possible.

Upon the warrant being promulgated, it shall be used exclusively in all general sessions courts and other courts when exercising general sessions court jurisdiction; provided, in general sessions courts that use a warrant containing substantially the same information as that contained on the uniform warrant and where warrant information collected by the AOC is collected and maintained electronically by the general sessions court clerk, a non-uniform warrant may be used.

The AOC, in consultation with the general sessions judges’ conference, Tennessee bar association, court clerks' association, Tennessee trial lawyers' association and the sheriffs' association, shall design and promulgate a uniform general sessions civil warrant. Upon the civil warrant being promulgated, it shall be used exclusively in all general sessions courts and other courts when exercising general sessions court jurisdiction; provided, in general sessions courts that use a civil warrant containing substantially the same information as that contained on the uniform civil warrant and where civil warrant information collected by the AOC is collected and maintained electronically by the general sessions court clerk, a non-uniform civil warrant may be used.

Acts 2000, ch. 968, § 1; 2001, ch. 362, § 1.

16-15-5013. Designation of division of general sessions court as mental health court.

The county commission of any county having a population of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may designate a division of the county's general sessions court as the mental health court. The mental health court shall be staffed using existing general sessions court staff members.

The mental health court is granted the power to hear cases involving petitions filed under the mental health law, compiled in title 33, and mental commitments.

The mental health court shall strive to identify and provide treatment and services to persons who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled or dually diagnosed, or persons who have a history of alcohol or drug abuse.

The mental health court shall also strive to create a single point of contact for persons governed by this section and shall seek to provide case management, forensic alternative community treatment and community-based services.

Acts 2004, ch. 703, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

16-15-5014. Domestic violence court for Shelby County.

In order to maximize and concentrate limited prosecutorial, counseling and other social resources to victims of domestic violence, the tenth division of the Shelby County general sessions court shall serve as the domestic violence court for Shelby County.

Provided that the caseload of the domestic violence court does not exceed the capacity of the tenth division to hear all such cases, the tenth division of the Shelby County general sessions court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over matters involving domestic violence, orders of protection, domestic assault and all other cases incident to domestic abuse as defined in § 36-3-601; provided, however, that the tenth division may retain concurrent jurisdiction over other types of cases. The determination whether the tenth division of the Shelby County general sessions court has exceeded its capacity to hear all domestic violence cases shall be made by the presiding judge of the tenth division in consultation with the chief judge of the Shelby County general sessions court.

If it has been determined pursuant to subsection (b) that the caseload of the domestic violence court exceeds the capacity of the tenth division of the Shelby County general sessions court to hear all such cases, then the excess cases shall be distributed among the remaining divisions of the Shelby County general sessions court to be heard.

The general sessions court shall commence as the domestic violence court for Shelby County no later than September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, ch. 391, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 391, § 2. June 9, 2009.